Massachusetts, session 194th, H2892.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 275, the words “and employees of the
commonwealth or of any county whose regular and major duties require them to have the care,
custody, instruction or other supervision of parolees or persons who are mentally ill or mentally
defective or defective delinquents or wayward children and employees of Cushing hospital” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- and employees or former employees of the
commonwealth or of any county who are active members of a retirement system, and members
of the state employees retirement system whose regular and the recurring majority of their duties
require them to have care, custody, instruction or other supervision, or require them to provide
services to parolees, persons who are mentally ill, or persons with physical, functional,
intellectual, or developmental disabilities, or delinquent youth, and employees of Cushing
hospital
of 4

SECTION 2. Section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 126, after the words “rendered in each
group;” the following:- provided, however, that classification of the eligible prior service
rendered by the member in each group shall be made by the retirement board from which the
member is retiring;
SECTION 3. Said section 5 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 130, after the words “rendered in each group” the following:-
provided, however, that classification of the eligible prior service rendered by the member in
each group shall be made by the retirement board from which the member is retiring
SECTION 4. Subsection (2) of said section 5 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended in subparagraph (a) by striking out the fourth sentence and inserting in
place thereof the following sentence:- A member who entered service on or before April, 2, 2012
and seeks Group 2 or Group 4 classification and is no longer a public employee at the time of the
member's retirement shall be classified based on the position from which the member was last
employed; provided that said member who entered service on or before April 2, 2102 and who is
no longer a public employee at the time of the member’s retirement and who has served in more
than 1 group may elect to receive a retirement allowance consisting of pro-rated benefits based
upon the percentage of total years of service that the member rendered in each group.
SECTION 5. Subdivision 6 of section 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in paragraph (b) by inserting after the final
sentence the following two sentences:- For each calendar year beginning subsequent to
December thirty-first, two thousand and twenty-three, ''regular interest'' shall mean interest
of 4

credited at a rate established by the commission, equal to the increase of the most recent
Consumer Price Index for New England issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
The rate established by the commission shall be taken to the nearest tenth of one per cent;
provided that the rate established by the commission shall not exceed two per cent.
SECTION 6. Subsection (4) of said section 26 of said chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
so appearing, is hereby amended in subparagraph (c) by inserting after the last paragraph the
following paragraphs:-
Any member in service who has attained the age of 55, who has accrued not less than
twenty years of creditable service in the department of state police, and who has served in more
than 1 group may elect to receive a retirement allowance consisting of pro-rated benefits as
determined by the state retirement board based upon the percentage of total years of service that
the member rendered in each group; provided, that such retirement allowance shall in no case
exceed 75 per cent of such regular compensation.
Any member in service as of April 2, 2012 who has not attained the age of 55, who has
accrued less than twenty years of creditable service in the department of state police, and who
has served in more than 1 group may elect to receive a retirement allowance consisting of pro-
rated benefits as determined by the state retirement board based upon the percentage of total
years of service that the member rendered in each group; provided, that such retirement
allowance shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of section 5 or 10 of Chapter 32;
provided further that any such service with the department of state police for purposes of this
paragraph shall be considered as Group 4. The retirement allowance provided in this paragraph
shall consist of pro-rated benefits based upon the percentage of total years of service that the
of 4

member rendered in each group; provided further, that the retirement allowance set forth in this
paragraph for members who became members on or after April 2, 2012, and who served in more
than one group, shall consist of pro-rated benefits based upon the percentage of total years of
service that member rendered in each group.
SECTION 7. Section 8 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following
sentence:- All amounts withheld under the provisions of section 19 and section 19A of chapter
32 forwarded by the state retirement board to the commission as provided by this section from
pensions or retirement allowances issued in the month of the death of any retiree, survivor or
beneficiary shall be returned to the state retirement board by the commission.
of 4